en: Soothing sounds: Heartbeat; Lullabies; Nature; White noise; Other
ko: 마음을 달래주는 소리: 심장박동; 자장가; 자연; 화이트 노이즈; 기타
ja: 心地良い音: ハートビート; 子守唄; 自然; ホワイトノイズ; その他
ru: Успокаивающие звуки: Сердцебиение; Колыбельные; Природа; Белый шум; Другое
th: เสียงที่ผ่อนคลาย: เสียงหัวใจเต้น; เพลงกล่อมเด็ก; ธรรมชาติ; ไวท์นอยส์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Pomirjujoči zvoki: Srčni utrip; Uspavanke; Narava; Beli šum; Drugo
sk-SK: Upokojujúce zvuky: Tlkot srdca; Uspávanky; Príroda; Biely šum; Iné
pt-PT: Sons suaves: Batimento cardiaco; Canções de embalar; Natureza; Ruído branco; Outro
fi: Rauhoittavia ääniä: Sydämenlyönti; kehtolauluja; Luonto; valkoinen kohina; Muu
ro-RO: Sunete calmante: Bătăile inimii; Cântece de leagăn; Natură; Zgomot alb; Altele
el: Καταπραϋντικοί ήχοι: Καρδιοχτύπι; Νανουρίσματα; Φύση; Λευκός θόρυβος; Άλλο
tr: Rahatlatıcı sesler: Kalp atışı; Ninniler; Doğa; Beyaz gürültü; Diğer
pl: Kojące dźwięki: Bicie serca; Kołysanki; Natura; Szum biały; Inne
hr-HR: Umirujući zvukovi: Otkucaji srca; Uspavanke; Priroda; Bijeli šum; Ostalo
nl: Rustgevende geluiden: Hartslag; Slaapliedjes; Natuur; Witte ruis; Andere
fr: Sons apaisants: Battement de cœur; Berceuses; Nature; Bruit blanc; Autre
bg-BG: Успокояващи звуци: Сърдечен пулс; Приспивни песни; Природа; Бял шум; Други
es: Sonidos relajantes: Latido del corazón; Canciones de cuna; Naturaleza; Ruido blanco; Otros
hu: Nyugtató hangok: Szívverés; Altatódalok; Természet; Fehér zaj; Egyéb
vi: Âm thanh êm dịu: Nhịp tim; Bài hát ru; Thiên nhiên; Tiếng ồn trắng; Khác
pt-BR: Sons calmantes: Batimento cardíaco; Canções de ninar; Natureza; Ruído branco; Outro
de: Beruhigende Klänge: Herzschlag; Schlaflieder; Natur; Weißes Rauschen; Sonstiges
sv: Lugnande ljud: Hjärtslag; Vaggvisor; Natur; Vitt brus; Övrigt
zh-CN: 舒缓的声音: 心跳声; 摇篮曲; 自然; 白噪声; 其他
da: Beroligende lyde: Hjerteslag; Vuggeviser; Natur; Hvid støj; Andet
cs: Uklidňující zvuky: Tlukot srdce; Ukolébavky; Příroda; Bílý šum; Jiné
lt-LT: Raminantys garsai: Širdies plakimas; Lopšinės; Gamta; Baltas triukšmas; Kita
it: Suoni rilassanti: Battito cardiaco; Ninne nanne; Natura; Rumore bianco; Altro
nb: Beroligende lyder: Hjerteslag; Vuggeviser; Natur; Hvitt støy; Annet
zh-TW: 舒緩的聲音: 心跳; 搖籃曲; 大自然; 白噪音; 其他